Utah statutes.
30-3-33.   Advisory guidelines.
In addition to the parent-time schedules provided in Sections 30-3-35 and
30-3-35.5, the following advisory guidelines are suggested to govern all
parent-time arrangements between parents.
(1)  Parent-time schedules mutually agreed upon by both parents are preferable
to a court-imposed solution.
(2)  The parent-time schedule shall be utilized to maximize the continuity and
stability of the child's life.
(3)  Special consideration shall be given by each parent to make the child
available to attend family functions including funerals, weddings, family
reunions, religious holidays, important ceremonies, and other significant
events in the life of the child or in the life of either parent which may
inadvertently conflict with the parent-time schedule.
(4)  The responsibility for the pick up, delivery, and return of the child
shall be determined by the court when the parent-time order is entered, and
may be changed at any time a subsequent modification is made to the parent-
time order.
(5)  If the noncustodial parent will be providing transportation, the
custodial parent shall have the child ready for parent-time at the time the
child is to be picked up and shall be present at the custodial home or shall
make reasonable alternate arrangements to receive the child at the time the
child is returned.
(6)  If the custodial parent will be transporting the child, the noncustodial
parent shall be at the appointed place at the time the noncustodial parent is
to receive the child, and have the child ready to be picked up at the
appointed time and place, or have made reasonable alternate arrangements for
the custodial parent to pick up the child.
(7)  Regular school hours may not be interrupted for a school-age child for
the exercise of parent-time by either parent.
(8)  The court may make alterations in the parent-time schedule to reasonably
accommodate the work schedule of both parents and may increase the parent-time
allowed to the noncustodial parent but shall not diminish the standardized
parent-time provided in Sections 30-3-35 and 30-3-35.5.
(9)  The court may make alterations in the parent-time schedule to reasonably
accommodate the distance between the parties and the expense of exercising
parent-time.
(10)  Neither parent-time nor child support is to be withheld due to either
parent's failure to comply with a court-ordered parent-time schedule.
(11)  The custodial parent shall notify the noncustodial parent within 24
hours of receiving notice of all significant school, social, sports, and
community functions in which the child is participating or being honored, and
the noncustodial parent shall be entitled to attend and participate fully.
(12)  The noncustodial parent shall have access directly to all school reports
including preschool and daycare reports and medical records and shall be
notified immediately by the custodial parent in the event of a medical
emergency.
(13)  Each parent shall provide the other with his current address and
telephone number, email address, and other virtual parent-time access
information within 24 hours of any change.
(14)  Each parent shall permit and encourage, during reasonable hours,
reasonable and uncensored communications with the child, in the form of mail
privileges and virtual parent-time if the equipment is reasonably available,
provided that if the parties cannot agree on whether the equipment is
reasonably available, the court shall decide whether the equipment for virtual
parent-time is reasonably available, taking into consideration:
(a)  the best interests of the child;
(b)  each parent's ability to handle any additional expenses for virtual
parent-time; and
(c)  any other factors the court considers material.
(15)  Parental care shall be presumed to be better care for the child than
surrogate care and the court shall encourage the parties to cooperate in
allowing the noncustodial parent, if willing and able to transport the
children, to provide the child care.  Child care arrangements existing during
the marriage are preferred as are child care arrangements with nominal or no
charge.
(16)  Each parent shall provide all surrogate care providers with the name,
current address, and telephone number of the other parent and shall provide
the noncustodial parent with the name, current address, and telephone number
of all surrogate care providers unless the court for good cause orders
otherwise.
(17)  Each parent shall be entitled to an equal division of major religious
holidays celebrated by the parents, and the parent who celebrates a religious
holiday that the other parent does not celebrate shall have the right to be
together with the child on the religious holiday.
(18)  If the child is on a different parent-time schedule than a sibling,
based on Sections 30-3-35 and 30-3-35.5, the parents should consider if an
upward deviation for parent-time with all the minor children so that parent-
time is uniform between school aged and nonschool aged children, is
appropriate.
